Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 14 Annual Reports

46-3-480.
Requirement of annual reports by electric membership corporation and foreign electric cooperative.

Each electric membership corporation and each foreign electric cooperative authorized to transact business in this state shall file, within the time prescribed by this article, an annual report setting forth:

The name of the electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative and the jurisdiction under the laws of which it is incorporated;

The address of the registered office of the electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative in this state and the name of its registered agent in this state at such address and, in the case of a foreign electric cooperative, the address of its principal office or registered office in the jurisdiction under the laws of which it is incorporated;

The names and respective addresses of the three principal officers of the electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative; and

Such additional information as may be necessary or appropriate as determined by the Secretary of State for the performance of his duties under this article.

Such annual report shall be made on forms prescribed by the Secretary of State; and the information therein contained shall be given as of the date of the execution of the report. The Secretary of State shall mail such report forms to the last known address of each electric membership corporation and foreign electric cooperative; however, the failure of any electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative to receive such forms shall not relieve that electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative of its responsibility to obtain appropriate forms, to complete them, and to file them with the Secretary of State. In the event an electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative has not filed a report within two previous calendar years, the Secretary of State shall not be required to mail to such electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative the required forms. The report shall be executed for the electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative by its president, a vice-president, secretary, an assistant secretary, treasurer, or an assistant treasurer. If the electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, the report shall be executed on behalf of the electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative by such receiver or trustee.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1301, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-481.
Filing of annual reports; correction of reports.

The annual report of an electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative shall be delivered to the Secretary of State between January 1 and April 1 of each year, except that the initial annual report of a foreign electric cooperative shall be filed with its application for a certificate of authority. The initial annual report of an electric membership corporation shall be filed within 90 days after the day its articles of incorporation are delivered to the Secretary of State for filing, except that the initial annual report of an electric membership corporation whose articles of incorporation are delivered to the Secretary of State for filing subsequent to October 1 shall be filed between January 1 and April 1 of the year next succeeding the calendar year in which its certificate of incorporation was issued by the Secretary of State. Proof to the satisfaction of the Secretary of State that prior to 12:00 Midnight on the last day of such filing period such report was deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, properly addressed, with first-class postage prepaid, shall be deemed a compliance with this requirement. If the Secretary of State finds that such report conforms to the requirements of this article, he shall file the same. If he finds that it does not so conform, he shall promptly return the same to the electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative for any necessary corrections, in which event the penalties prescribed in Code Section 46-3-540 for failure to file such report within the time provided in this Code section shall not apply if such report is corrected to conform to the requirements of this article and returned to the Secretary of State within one calendar month from the date it was returned by him to the electric membership corporation or foreign electric cooperative.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-1302, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.